Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1250.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Safe Workplace Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abusive conduct." As follows:(1) Unwelcome, degrading and dehumanizing conduct that is severe or pervasive enough to create a work environment that a reasonable person would consider toxic, hostile or abusive. The following apply:(i) Conduct may include false accusations, sabotage 1234567891011121314151617 of work performance, consistent ignoring or ostracism, removal of major responsibilities, consistent unreasonable workloads, excessive monitoring, consistent micromanagement, persistent hypercriticism, impossible deadlines, pressure to engage in unethical behavior or give up rights or benefits, retaliation for speaking up or repeated verbal abuse.(ii) Isolated, minor incidents and expressions of disagreement and constructive feedback are not bullying unless they meet the threshold of abuse.(iii) Workplace bullying may be perpetrated by one or more persons.(iv) Workplace bullying is found by a review of the totality of the circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, frequency and duration of the conduct.(2) It shall be considered an aggravating factor if the conduct exploited an employee's known psychological or physical illness or disability.(3) A single act normally shall not constitute abusive conduct unless the act is egregious."Abusive work environment." An employment condition permeated with acts or omissions of acts by an employer, supervisor or one or more of an employer's employees sufficiently plausible to cause pain or distress to an employee."Adverse employment action." A materially and objectively adverse reduction in terms, conditions or privileges of employment, including:(1) a termination, demotion, unfavorable reassignment or failure to promote;(2) disciplinary action; or20260SB1250PN1543 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) reduction in compensation."Employ." To engage, suffer or permit to work."Employee." As follows:(1) An individual employed by an employer.(2) A worker is considered an employee and not an independent contractor unless the worker satisfies all three of the following conditions:(i) The worker is free from the control and direction of the employer in connection with the performance of work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.(ii) The worker performs work that is outside the usual course of the employer's business.(iii) The worker is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed."Employer." The Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, an instrumentality of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth or a person, association, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability company or corporation that, directly or indirectly, through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours or working conditions of an employee.Section 3. Abusive work environment.(a) Prohibition.--An employee may not be subjected to an abusive work environment by an employer or other employee.(b) Retaliation prohibited.--An employer or employee may not retaliate in any manner against an employee who has opposed an 20260SB1250PN1543 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unlawful employment practice under this act or who has made a charge, testified, assisted or participated in any manner in an investigation or proceeding under this act, including by:(1) internal complaints and proceedings;(2) arbitration and mediation proceedings; or(3) legal actions.Section 4. Employer liability.An employer shall be liable for a violation of section 3 committed by an employer's employee. If the alleged violation of section 3 does not include an adverse employment action, it shall be an affirmative defense for an employer only that the employer exercised reasonable care to promptly prevent and correct any actionable behavior.Section 5. Employee liability.An employee may be individually liable for a violation of section 3. It shall be an affirmative defense for an employee only that the employee committed a violation of section 3 at the direction of the employer, under actual or implied threat of an adverse employment action.Section 6. Affirmative defenses.(a) Preventive and responsive measures.--Employers and representative employees shall take all reasonable preventive and responsive measures to provide safe work environments free from bullying by:(1) Acknowledging and responding to complaints of bullying within a reasonable time frame appropriate to the level of urgency.(2) Providing and executing a transparent, timely complaint process that includes a legitimate, fair and fact-finding investigation and the issuance of timely and accurate 20260SB1250PN1543 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reports of findings.(3) Providing and executing a transparent disciplinary process according to the severity of the offense within a reasonable time frame, if applicable, including, but not limited to, coaching, counseling, issuing a warning or other disciplinary action, including removal of supervisory duties or termination.(4) Maintaining accurate records of complaints, findings and discipline.(5) Within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, writing, distributing, posting or otherwise providing a written preventive policy against all forms of bullying, to include an anti-retaliation policy and an identification and description of all reporting methods, consistent with this section and all other laws. The policies shall be distributed to employees on a regular basis.(6) Training all employees on preventive and reporting policies.(b) Complaint.--Any of the following is an affirmative defense to an action under section 3:(1) The complaint is based on a reasonable performance evaluation.(2) The complaint is based on an employer's reasonable investigation about potentially illegal or unethical activity.(3) The complaint is based on an action taken by the employer that it was required by law to take.Section 7. Enforcement.A person aggrieved by a violation of this act may initiate a civil action or other proceeding in a court of competent 20260SB1250PN1543 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction not later than three years from the date of the last alleged violation of section 3.Section 8. Remedies.(a) Relief.--If a defendant has been found liable for a violation of section 3, the court may enjoin the defendant from engaging in the unlawful employment practice and may order any other relief that is deemed appropriate, including any of the following:(1) Rehiring of the plaintiff, reinstatement to a position and rescission of an adverse employment action.(2) Removal of the offending party from the plaintiff's work environment.(3) Payment of back pay, front pay and medical expenses.(4) Damages for pain and suffering.(5) Damages for emotional distress.(6) Punitive damages.(7) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.(b) Limitation.--If an employer is liable for a violation of section 3 that did not include an unlawful adverse employment action, emotional distress damages and punitive damages may be awarded only when the actionable conduct was extreme and outrageous. The limitation does not apply to individually named employee defendants.Section 9. Collective bargaining or arbitration agreements.This act shall not prevent, interfere, exempt or supersede provisions of an employee's collective bargaining or arbitration agreement that provide greater rights and protections than prescribed in this act. This act shall not prevent new provisions of the collective bargaining or arbitration agreement that provide greater rights, remedies and protections from being 20260SB1250PN1543 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implemented and applicable to the employee within the collective bargaining or arbitration agreement.Section 10. Effect of other laws.(a) Effect.--Except as provided in subsection (b), provisions of this act may not be deemed to exempt a person from a liability, duty or penalty provided by any other provision of law. The remedies provided under section 8 shall be in addition to remedies provided under any other provision of law.(b) Exception.--Payments of workers' compensation shall be reimbursed from damages paid under this act if an employee receives compensation:(1) for medical costs for the same injury or illness under this act and the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act; or(2) in cash payments under this act and the Workers' Compensation Act for the same period of time not working as a result of the compensable injury or illness or unlawful employment practice.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1250PN1543 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920